North Dakota, session 69, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - ADVANCED NUCLEAR ENERGY.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the feasibility, siting, and
deployment of advanced nuclear power plants in the state. The study must include evaluation
of:
a. Siting locations, including potential greenfield and brownfield sites, the identification and
assessment of undeveloped land suitable for construction, developed land suitable for
rehabilitation and reuse, geographical locations, environmental impacts, proximity to
infrastructure, and community acceptance;
b. Electric grid connectivity, including the capacity of the electrical grid and integration of a
nuclear power plant to the state, necessary upgrades and expansions to ensure
reliability, and recommendations adhering to national and state electric standards and
regulations;
c. Land use considerations, including long-term sustainability of proposed sites,
environmental and social factors, land use patterns and zoning regulations, potential
impacts on local land use, and proposed mitigation strategies;
d. Economic impacts, including potential tax revenue, job creation during construction and
operation of a nuclear facility, economic impacts on local and state economies, and
investor appeal;
e. Temporary and permanent nuclear waste storage, including in-state and out-of-state
siting locations;
f. Small modular and micro nuclear reactors, including the feasibility of constructing and
operating small modular and micro reactors to generate power in the state; and
g. Provisions of the North Dakota Century Code that place restrictions on advanced nuclear
energy development, if any.
2. The study must invite participation from an institution of higher education for assistance in
evaluating social interests and community acceptance of potential siting locations.
3. The committee must consist of:
a. Two members representing the energy industry, appointed by the legislative
management;
b. One member appointed by the public service commission;
c. One member appointed by the industrial commission;
d. One member appointed by the director of the department of water resources;

H. B. NO. 1025 - PAGE 2
e. Three members of the house of representatives selected by the majority leader of the
house of representatives, two of whom must represent the majority faction of the house
of representatives and one of whom must represent the minority faction of the house of
representatives; and
f. Three members of the senate selected by the majority leader of the senate, two of whom
must represent the majority faction of the senate and one of whom must represent the
minority faction of the senate.
4. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
5. a. A member of the committee who is not a state employee is entitled to reimbursement for
mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees, to be paid by
the legislative council.
b. A state employee who is a member of the committee is entitled to receive that
employee's regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses to
be paid by the employing agency.
c. A member of the committee who is a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to
receive per diem compensation at the rate provided under section 54-35-10 for each day
performing official duties of the committee. The legislative council shall pay the per diem
compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as provided by law for any
member of the committee who is a member of the legislative assembly.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL - ADVANCED NUCLEAR ENERGY
STUDY - MATCHING FUNDS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $300,000, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, and from special funds derived from grants or donations from nonstate
sources, the sum of $300,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the legislative council for
the purpose of contracting for consulting services for the study provided for in section 1 of this Act, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The legislative council shall seek
matching funds from the private sector to the extent available to assist with the cost of the project. The
funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

H. B. NO. 1025 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1025.
House Vote: Yeas 77 Nays 14 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State